Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.765

Reports of transfer, release or changes as to committed or imprisoned persons—Records.

The principal officers of the jails, correctional institutions, state mental institutions and all places of detention to which a person is committed under chapter 10.77 RCW, chapter 71.06 RCW, or chapter 71.09 RCW for treatment or under a sentence of imprisonment for any crime as provided for in RCW 43.43.735 shall within seventy-two hours, report to the section, any interinstitutional transfer, release or change of release status of any person held in custody pursuant to the rules promulgated by the chief.

The principal officers of all state mental institutions to which a person has been committed under chapter 10.77 RCW, chapter 71.06 RCW, or chapter 71.09 RCW shall keep a record of the photographs, description, fingerprints, and other identification data as may be obtainable from the appropriate criminal justice agency.

[ 1990 c 3 s 131; 1983 c 3 s 108; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 14.]